NO.11 FAST IDLE/RUNS ON [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


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11

RUNS IDLE/RUNS ON

DESCRIPTION
•  Engine speed continues at fast idle after warm-up.
•  Engine runs after the engine switch is turned off.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Accelerator pedal position (APP) sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Suction control valve (built-in supply pump)
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Vacuum leakage
Warning
The following troubleshooting flow chart contains the fuel system diagnosis and repair procedures. Read the following warnings before performing the fuel system services:
•  Fuel vapor is hazardous. It can easily ignite, causing serious injury and damage. Always keep sparks and flames away from fuel.
•  Fuel line spills and leakage are dangerous. Fuel can ignite and cause serious injury or death and damage. Fuel can also irritate skin and eyes. To prevent this, always complete “BEFORE REPAIR PROCEDURE” and “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE” described in this manual.

Diagnostic Procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Access the ECT PID.
Start and warm-up the engine to normal operating temperature.
Is the ECT PID reading between 82—112 °C {180—233 °F}?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
ECT PID is higher than 112 °C{233 °F}:
Go to the symptom troubleshooting “NO.19 COOLING SYSTEM CONCERNS—OVERHEATING [MZR-CD (RF-Turbo)]”.
ECT PID is less than 82 °C{180 °F}:
Go to the symptom troubleshooting “NO.20 COOLING SYSTEM CONCERNS—RUNS COLD [MZR-CD (RF-Turbo)]”.
2
Perform the self-test function using the M-MDS.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are any DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect the following:
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 119 or 120
•  Open circuit PCM control relay and PCM terminal 105
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 1, 2, 3, 114 or 117)
•  Poor connection to vehicle body ground
No
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
3
Inspect the suction control valve.
Is the suction control valve normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the supply pump.
4
Inspect the fuel injector.
Is the fuel injector normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the fuel injector.
5
Inspect the APP sensor.
Is the APP sensor normal?
Yes
Inspect the vacuum leakage.
No
Replace the accelerator component.
6
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms.
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect the related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, reprogram the PCM if later calibration is available. Retest.